Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
CHAPTER 10 Consumers’ Utility Counsel Division

46-10-1 through 46-10-9.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 139, §§ 1-8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 46; Ga. L. 1983, p. 834, § 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 494, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1718, § 1, 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1707, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 46; Ga. L. 1995, p. 167, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 303, §§ 12, 15/HB 117; Ga. L. 2012, p. 700, § 1/HB 769; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 45/SB 148, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 45/SB 148 repealed and reserved this chapter, effective July 1, 2015.